Arkansas, session 2025, HB1480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-85-204(3), concerning the definition of
"approved institution of higher education" under the Arkansas Academic
Challenge Scholarship Program, is amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) “Approved institution of higher education” means an
institution of higher education approved by the division to participate in
the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program and that is:
(i) A state-supported two-year or four-year college
or university;
(ii) A private, nonprofit two-year or four-year
college or university with its primary headquarters located in Arkansas that
is eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid funds;
(iii) An approved school of nursing, subject to the
provisions of § 6-85-213(c);
(iv)(a) A public or private vocational-technical
*TNL207*
02/13/2025 1:16:20 PM TNL207

HB1480
school.
(b) A public or private vocational-technical
school shall be bonded and insured; or
(v)(a) A public or private technical institute.
(b) A public or private technical institute
shall be bonded and insured; or
(vi) A training program that offers a certificate
upon completion and that is part of a state-supported two-year or four-year
college or university, including without limitation the Arkansas Fire
Training Academy.
(B) An approved institution of higher education that is a
private, nonprofit two-year or four-year college or university shall be
eligible to receive Title IV federal student aid funds;























02/13/2025 1:16:20 PM TNL207